Maryland, session 2026, HB0699.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–524.
(a) This section shall be known as the Maryland Use of Force Statute.
(b) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning stated in § 3–201 of this
title.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0699*

HOUSE BILL 699
(3) “Police officer” means:
(i) a police officer as defined in § 3–201 of this title; or
(ii) a special police officer as defined in § 3–301 of this title.
(4) “Serious physical injury” has the meaning stated in § 3–201 of the
Criminal Law Article.
(c) Each police officer shall sign an affirmative written sanctity of life pledge to
respect every human life and act with compassion toward others.
(d) (1) A police officer may not use force against a person unless, under the
totality of the circumstances, the force is necessary and proportional to:
(i) prevent an imminent threat of physical injury to a person; or
(ii) effectuate a legitimate law enforcement objective.
(2) A police officer shall cease the use of force as soon as:
(i) the person on whom the force is used:
1. is under the police officer’s control; or
2. no longer poses an imminent threat of physical injury or
death to the police officer or to another person; or
(ii) the police officer determines that force will no longer accomplish
a legitimate law enforcement objective.
(e) A police officer shall:
(1) when time, circumstances, and safety allow, take steps to gain
compliance and de–escalate conflict without using physical force;
(2) intervene to prevent or terminate the use of force by another police
officer beyond what is authorized under subsection (d) of this section;
(3) render basic first aid to a person injured as a result of police action and
promptly request appropriate medical assistance; and
(4) fully document all use of force incidents that the officer observed or was
involved in.
(f) A police supervisor shall:

HOUSE BILL 699 3
(1) respond to the scene of any incident during which a police officer used
physical force and caused serious physical injury; and
(2) gather and review all known video recordings of a use of force incident.
(g) A law enforcement agency shall:
(1) have a written de–escalation of force policy; and
(2) adopt a written policy requiring supervisory and command–level review
of all use of force incidents.
(h) A police officer shall:
(1) undergo training on when a police officer may or may not draw a
firearm or point a firearm at a person and enforcement options that are less likely to cause
death or serious physical injury, including scenario–based training, de–escalation tactics
and techniques, and reasonable alternatives to decrease physical injury; and
(2) sign a training completion document stating that the officer
understands and shall comply with the Maryland Use of Force Statute.
(i) (1) A police officer may not intentionally violate subsection (d) of this
section, resulting in serious physical injury or death to a person.
(2) A police officer who violates paragraph (1) of this subsection is guilty of
a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 10 years.
(3) A sentence imposed under this subsection may be separate from and
consecutive to or concurrent with a sentence for any crime based on the act establishing a
violation of this subsection.
(J) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY NOT INTENTIONALLY VIOLATE
SUBSECTION (E)(2) OR (3) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) A POLICE OFFICER WHO VIOLATES PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS.
(3) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE
SEPARATE FROM AND CONSECUTIVE TO OR CONCURRENT WITH A SENTENCE FOR
ANY CRIME BASED ON THE ACT ESTABLISHING A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.